Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 1

General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 4: Mar. 6, 1970. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Sixty-Seventh General Assembly meeting in Extraordinary Session that requiring all dram shops and drinking houses to remain closed the night after an election, after the polls have closed, serves no useful purpose, and is unnecessarily restrictive to the operation of dram shops and drinking houses, and the free enterprise system, and that this act will correct this undesirable situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 946 and 963, § 14: Jan. 1, 1996.

Acts 2001, No. 1839, § 35: Became law without Governor's signature Apr. 20, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Code relating to campaign financing and ethics are vague or otherwise in need of modification; that this act accomplishes those purposes; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible so that those persons who are subject to the provisions of the various ethics and campaign finance statutes receive the benefit of the clarifications as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1167, § 2: July 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, No. 2233, § 48: Jan. 1, 2006.

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 595, § 7, provided: “This act shall become effective upon the later of the following:

“(1)January 1, 2014; or

“(2)The appropriation and availability of funding to the Secretary of State for the issuance of voter identification cards under Section 5 of this act.”The contingency in Acts 2013, No. 595, § 7 was met by Acts 2013, No. 1376.

Acts 2015, No. 1280, § 16: Apr. 8, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of Arkansas adopted Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, at the 2014 General Election, which added Sections 28, 29, and 30 to Article 19 of the Arkansas Constitution; that Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 94, requires the General Assembly to provide by law that Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 be under the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Ethics Commission; that this act should become effective at the earliest opportunity to allow the commission to enforce Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, Sections 28, 29, and 30 and issue guidance to affected public officials; and that the additional provisions of this act provide clarity to the ethics laws of the State of Arkansas and should become effective at the earliest opportunity to prevent confusion and avoid incorrect applications of the state's ethics laws. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

7-1-101. Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context or chapter otherwise requires:

“Administrator” means the administrative head of a long-term care or residential carefacility licensed by the state who is authorized in writing by a patient of the long-term care or residentialcare facility to deliver the application for an absentee ballot and to obtain or deliver the absentee ballotto the county clerk;

“Affidavit of eligibility” means an affidavit signed by a candidate for elective office statingthat the candidate is eligible to serve in the office he or she seeks;

“Audit log” means an electronically stored record of events and ballot images from whichelection officials may produce a permanent paper record with a manual audit capacity for a votingsystem using voting machines;

“Authorized agent” means a person who is identified and authorized to deliver theapplication, obtain a ballot, and deliver the ballot on the day of the election to the county clerk for anapplicant who is medically unable to cast a ballot at a polling site due to an unforeseen medicalnecessity as set forth in an affidavit from the administrator of a hospital or long-term care or residentialcare facility;

“Canvassing” means examining and counting the returns of votes cast at a public election todetermine authenticity;

“Certificate of choice” means a certificate, signed by an executive officer of a political groupthat submits a petition to place its candidates for President and Vice-President on the ballot,designating the names of its candidates to appear on the ballot;

“Constitutional officers of this state” means the offices of the Governor, LieutenantGovernor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, Auditor of State, Treasurer of State, and Commissionerof State Lands;

“Counting location” means a location selected by the county board of electioncommissioners with respect to all elections for the automatic processing or counting, or both, of votes;

“Designated bearer” means any person who is identified and authorized by the applicant toobtain from the county clerk or to deliver to the county clerk the applicant's ballot;

(A)“Election media” means any device used in an election definition or to record votes cast with a direct record electronic machine or voting machine.

“Election media” includes without limitation:

Memory stick devices;

Digital flashcards;

Personalized electronic ballots (PEBs);

Personal computer cards; and

Zip disks;

“Election official” or “election officer” means a person who is a member of the county board of election commissioners, a person who performs election coordinator duties, a person who is a poll worker designated by a county board of election commissioners to be an election clerk, election judge, or election sheriff, or a deputy county clerk or a person assigned by a county clerk to conduct early voting;

“Electronic poll book” means hardware or software or a combination of hardware andsoftware that allows election officials to view voter registration records and voting information duringan election at an early voting location or at a polling site on election day;

“Electronic vote tabulating device” means a device used to electronically scan a markedpaper ballot for the purpose of tabulation;

“Fail-safe voting” means the mechanism established under the National Voter RegistrationAct of 1993, 52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq., that allows a voter who has moved within the same county to vote at his or her newprecinct without having updated his or her voter registration records;

“First-time voter” means any registered voter who has not previously voted in a federalelection in the state;

“General or special election” means the regular biennial or annual election for election ofUnited States, state, district, county, township, and municipal officials and the special elections to fillvacancies therein and special elections to approve any measure. The term as used in this act shall notapply to school elections for officials of school districts;

“Infamous crimes” for the purposes of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 9, includes:

A felony offense;

A misdemeanor theft of property offense;

Abuse of office, §5-52-107;

Tampering, §5-53-110; or

A misdemeanor offense in which the finder of fact was required to find, or thedefendant to admit, an act of deceit, fraud, or false statement;

“Majority party” means that political party in the State of Arkansas whose candidates wereelected to a majority of the constitutional offices of this state in the last preceding general election;

“Marking device” means any approved device operated by a voter to record the voter's choices through marking or creating a paper ballot with ink or other substance that will enable the votes to be tabulated by means of an electronic vote tabulating device;

“Member of the merchant marine” means:

An individual employed as an officer or crew member of:

A vessel documented under the laws of the United States;

A vessel owned by the United States; or

A vessel of foreign-flag registry under charter or control of the UnitedStates;

An individual enrolled with the United States for employment or training foremployment or maintained by the United States for emergency relief service as an officer or crewmember of any such vessel; or

As defined in the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §20301 et seq., ifdifferent from the definition stated in this subdivision (20);

“Minority party” means that political party whose candidates were elected to less than amajority of the constitutional offices of this state in the last preceding general election or the politicalparty that polled the second greatest number of votes for the office of Governor in the last precedinggeneral election if all of the elected constitutional officers of this state are from a single political party;

(A)“Nonpartisan candidate” means a candidate for the office of Justice of the SupremeCourt, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, district judge, or prosecuting attorney.

“Nonpartisan candidate” does not include a candidate for nonpartisan municipaloffice;

(A)“Nonpartisan election” means a general, special, or runoff election for the office ofJustice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, district judge, or prosecutingattorney.

“Nonpartisan election” does not include a general, special, or runoff election for anonpartisan municipal office;

(A)“Nonpartisan office” means the office of Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of theCourt of Appeals, circuit judge, district judge, or prosecuting attorney.

“Nonpartisan office” does not include a nonpartisan municipal office;

“Party certificate” means a written statement or receipt signed by the secretary or chair ofthe county committee or of the state committee, as the case may be, of the political party evidencingthe name and title proposed to be used by the candidate on the ballot, the position the candidate seeks,payment of the fees, and filing of the party pledge, if any, required by the political party;

“Party filing period” means the period of time established by law for the candidate for apolitical party's nomination to file his or her party certificate with the Secretary of State or county clerk,as the case may be;

(A)“Political party” means any group of voters that at the last preceding general electionpolled for its candidate for Governor in the state or nominees for presidential electors at least threepercent (3%) of the entire vote cast for the office.

A group of electors shall not assume a name or designation that is so similar in theopinion of the Secretary of State to that of an existing political party as to confuse or mislead the votersat an election.

When any political party fails to obtain three percent (3%) of the total votes cast at an election for the office of Governor or nominees for presidential electors, it shall cease to be a political party;

“Polling site” means a location selected by the county board of election commissionerswhere votes are cast;

“Precinct” means a geographical area, the boundaries of which are determined by a countyboard of election commissioners in order to facilitate voting by the registered voters from thatgeographical area;

“Primary election” means any election held by a political party in the manner provided bylaw for the purpose of selecting nominees of the political party for certification as candidates forelection at any general or special election in this state;

(A)“Printed campaign materials” means:

Literature mailed to an elector that is intended to or calculated to influence the vote of an elector in an election in this state, including without limitation signs, banners, flyers, and pamphlets; and

Yard signs and push cards intended to or calculated to influence the vote of an elector in an election in this state.

“Printed campaign materials” does not mean political paraphernalia, including without limitation stickers, buttons, pens, T-shirts, nail files, or other similar trinkets;

“Provisional ballot” means a ballot:

Cast by special procedures to record a vote when there is some question concerninga voter's eligibility; and

Counted contingent upon the verification of the voter's eligibility;

“Qualified elector” means a person who holds the qualifications of an elector and who isregistered pursuant to Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51;

“Sample ballot” means a ballot for distribution to the public or the press marked with theword “SAMPLE” so as to prevent the production of counterfeit ballots;

“Uniformed services” means the United States Army, United States Navy, United States Air Force, United States Marine Corps, United States Coast Guard, the United States Commissioned Corps of the Public Health Service, and the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Commissioned Officer Corps, or as defined in the federal Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq., if different from the definition stated in this subdivision (35);

“Vacancy in election” means the vacancy in an elective office created by death, resignation,or other good and legal cause arising prior to election to the office at a general or special election butarising subsequent to the certification of the ballot;

“Vacancy in nomination” means the circumstances in which:

The person who received the majority of votes at the preferential primary electionor general primary election cannot accept the nomination due to death or notifies the party that he orshe will not accept the nomination due to serious illness, moving out of the area from which the personwas elected as the party's nominee, or filing for another office preceding the final date for certificationof nominations; or

There is a tie vote for the same office at a general primary election;

(A)“Vacancy in office” means the vacancy in an elective office created by death,resignation, or other good and legal cause arising subsequent to election to the office at a general orspecial election or arising subsequent to taking office and before the expiration of the term of office inthose circumstances wherein the vacancy must be filled by a special election rather than byappointment.

“Vacancy in office” does not apply to the election of a person at a general electionto fill an unexpired portion of a term of office;

(A)“Verification of voter registration” means:

Presenting a document or identification card when appearing to vote in person that:

Shows the name of the person to whom the document or identification card was issued;

(b)

Shows a photograph of the person to whom the document or identification card was issued;

(c)

Is issued by the United States, the State of Arkansas, or an accredited postsecondary educational institution in the State of Arkansas; and

(d)

If displaying an expiration date, is not expired or expired no more than four (4) years before the date of the election in which the voter seeks to vote; or

(ii)

Submitting with an absentee ballot verification of voter registration in the form of a copy of a document or identification card that complies with the requirements of subdivision (39)(A)(i) of this section.

(B)

A document or identification card may be presented in a digital format on an electronic device if the document or identification card:

(i)

Complies with the requirements of subdivision (39)(A) of this section; and

(ii)

The digital format has been approved or issued by the United States, the State of Arkansas, or an accredited postsecondary educational institution in the State of Arkansas.

(C)

Documents and identification cards that comply with the requirements of subdivision (39)(A) of this section include without limitation:

(i)

A driver's license;

(ii)

A photo identification card;

(iii)

A concealed handgun carry license;

(iv)

A United States passport;

(v)

An employee badge or identification document issued by an accredited postsecondary educational institution in the State of Arkansas;

(vi)

A United States Armed Forces identification document;

(vii)

A public assistance identification card if the card shows a photograph of the person to whom the document or identification card was issued; and

(viii)

A voter verification card under §7-5-324;

(40)

“Vote center” means an election day location designated by the county clerk or county
board of election commissioners at which a qualified elector from any precinct in the county holding the
election may vote;

(41)

“Voter-verified paper audit trail” means a contemporaneous paper record of a ballot
printed for the voter to confirm his or her votes before the voter casts his or her ballot that:

(A)

Allows the voter to verify the voter-verified paper audit trail before the casting of
the voter's ballot;

(B)

Is not retained by the voter;

(C)

Does not contain individual voter information;

(D)

Is produced on paper that is sturdy, clean, and resistant to degradation; and

(E)

Is readable in a manner that makes the voter's ballot choices obvious to the voter
without the use of computer or electronic code;

(42)

“Voting machine” means either:

(A)

A direct-recording electronic voting machine that:

(i)

Records votes by means of a ballot display provided with mechanical or
electro-optical components that may be actuated by the voter;

(ii)

Processes the data by means of a computer program;

(iii)

Records voting data and ballot images in internal and external memory
components; and

(iv)

Produces a tabulation of the voting data stored in a removable memory
component and on a printed copy; or

(B)

One (1) or more electronic devices that operate independently or as a combination of a ballot marking device and an electronic vote tabulating device; and

(43)

“Voting system” means:

(A)

The total combination of mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic equipment,
including the software, firmware, and documentation required to program, control, and support the
equipment that is used to:

(i)

Define ballots;

(ii)

Cast and count votes;

(iii)

Report or display election results; and

(iv)

Maintain and produce any audit trail information; and

(B)

The practices and documentation used to:

(i)

Identify system components and versions of components;

(ii)

Test the system during its development and maintenance;

(iii)

Maintain records of system errors and defects;

(iv)

Determine specific system changes to be made to a system after the initial
qualification of the system; and

(v)

Make available any materials to the voter, including without limitation
notices, instructions, forms, or paper ballots.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 1, § 1; 1971, No. 261, § 1; 1977, No. 888, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-101; Acts 1987, No. 123, § 12; 1991, No. 241, § 1; 1995, No. 946, § 1; 1995, No. 963, § 1; 1997, No. 445, § 1; 1997, No. 1082, § 1; 1999, No. 1342, § 1; 2003, No. 994, § 1; 2003, No. 1731, § 1; 2005, No. 2233, § 2; 2007, No. 224, § 1; 2007, No. 1020, § 1; 2009, No. 250, § 1; 2009, No. 659, § 5; 2009, No. 959, § 2; 2009, No. 1480, § 14; 2011, No. 203, § 1; 2013, No. 595, § 1; 2013, No. 724, § 3; 2013, No. 1110, § 1; 2013, No. 1126, § 1; 2013, No. 1211, § 1; 2013, No. 1297, § 1; 2013, No. 1389, § 1; 2015, No. 1042, §
1; 2015, No. 1218, §§ 1-3; 2017, No. 633, § 4; 2017, No. 787, § 1; 2019, No. 684, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2013, No. 724, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent.

“(1)

Article 5, § 9, of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas states that ‘[n]o person hereafter convicted of embezzlement of public money, bribery, forgery or other infamous crime, shall be eligible to the General Assembly or capable of holding any office of trust or profit in this State’.

“(2)

In interpreting that constitutional provision, the Supreme Court of Arkansas has ‘consistently recognized that a person convicted of a felony or one of the specifically enumerated offenses is disqualified from holding public office under Article 5, Section 9, of the Arkansas Constitution.’ State v. Oldner, 361 Ark. 316, 206 S.W.3d 818 (2005). However, while the Court has expounded on what constitutes an ‘infamous crime’, such as when it spoke of an offense ‘indicative of great moral turpitude’, State v. Irby, 190 Ark. 786, 81 S.W.2d 419 (1935), it has not until very recently attempted to define the term.

“(3)

In 2005, the Supreme Court determined that, aside from the specifically named crimes in Article 5, § 9, an ‘infamous crime’ involved dishonesty. Oldner, 361 Ark. at 327, 206 S.W.3d at 822. In 2010, the Supreme Court specifically held that theft constituted an ‘infamous crime’. Edwards v. Campbell, 2010 Ark. 398, 370 S.W.3d 250 (2010). This, however, is as specific as the Supreme Court has gotten, as it further noted that ‘a crime is not considered infamous based on the available punishment but rather is considered infamous based on the underlying nature of that crime.’ Id.

“(4)

Because of the uncertainty associated with the term ‘infamous crime’, and in the interests of educating the general public and potential office holders about who is or is not eligible to hold public office in this state, it is the intent of the General Assembly to define the term ‘infamous crime’ for the purpose of assisting the judiciary in its further definitional refinements.”

Acts 2013, No. 724, § 2, provided: “Legislative findings.

“The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Article 5, § 9, of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas states that ‘[n]o person hereafter convicted of embezzlement of public money, bribery, forgery or other infamous crime, shall be eligible to the General Assembly or capable of holding any office of trust or profit in this State';

“(2)

A definition of ‘infamous crime' should also encompass those criminal offenses that lead to a loss of public confidence as well as offenses in the nature of perjury or subornation of perjury, false statement, criminal fraud, embezzlement, false pretense, or any other offense that involves some element of deceitfulness, untruthfulness, or falsification; and

“(3)

A reviewing court should also measure certain variables when determining what constitutes an ‘infamous crime', such as the attendant mental state of the offense, the particular circumstances surrounding the charged offense, the age and education of the person committing the offense, and, if the offense occurred before the person has assumed public office, the age of the person at the time of the conviction itself.”

Acts 2017, No. 787, § 3, as amended by Acts 2019, No. 222, § 1, provided: “Applicability. A candidate running for election to any public office who possesses or creates a campaign sign, campaign literature, or other printed campaign material that does not comply with this act is exempt from compliance with this act if the campaign sign, campaign literature, or other printed campaign material was created before the effective date of this act”.

It is unclear when the exemption described in Acts 2019, No. 222 takes effect. The Uncodified Section 3 of Acts 2017, No. 787, which is being amended by Act 222, was in effect August 2017.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 250 substituted “administrator” for “administrative head” in (3), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 659 inserted (15) and (25), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 inserted (5), redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1480 inserted present (2) and (18) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2011 amendment subdivided (30) into introductory language and (30)(A); and added (30)(B).

The 2013 amendment by No. 595 added the definition for “Proof of identity”.

The 2013 amendment by No. 724 added the definition for “Infamous crimes”.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1110 added definitions for “Nonpartisan candidate”, “Nonpartisan election”, and “Nonpartisan office”.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1126 substituted “Vacancy in office does” for “The phrase ‘vacancy’ shall” in (37)(B) [now (38)(B)].

The 2013 amendment by No. 1211 added the definition for “Precinct”.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1297 added the definition for “Electronic poll book”.

The 2013 amendment by No. 1389 added the definition for “Vote center”.

The 2015 amendment by No. 1042, in (10) [now (11)], inserted “a person who performs election coordinator duties” and added “or a deputy county clerk or a person assigned by a county clerk to conduct early voting”.

The 2015 amendment by No. 1218 rewrote (18) [now (19)] and (40)(B) [now (41)(B)]; and added the definition for “Election media”.

The 2017 amendment by No. 633 deleted the former definition of “Proof of identity”, added the definition of “Verification of voter registration”, and redesignated remaining definitions accordingly; and substituted “52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.” for “42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq.” in (35).

The 2017 amendment by No. 787 added the definition of “Printed campaign materials”; and redesignated remaining definitions accordingly.

The 2019 amendment inserted (39)(B) and redesignated former (39)(B) as (39)(C).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1969, No. 465, codified as §§7-1-101,7-1-103 —7-1-105,7-3-101 —7-3-108,7-4-101 —7-4-105,7-4-107 —7-4-112,7-5-101,7-5-102,
7-5-103 [repealed],7-5-202 —7-5-209,7-5-210 [repealed],7-5-211,7-5-301,7-5-302 [repealed],7-5-303 [repealed],7-5-304 —7-5-306,7-5-307 [repealed],7-5-308,7-5-309,7-5-312,7-5-313 [repealed],7-5-314 —7-5-319,7-5-401,7-5-402,7-5-405 —7-5-417,7-5-501 [repealed],7-5-502 —7-5-504,7-5-505 [repealed],7-5-506 [repealed],7-5-507,7-5-508 [repealed],
7-5-509,7-5-511 [repealed],7-5-512,7-5-513,7-5-514 [repealed],7-5-515 —7-5-518,7-5-519 [repealed],7-5-520 —7-5-522,7-5-524 —7-5-531,7-5-701 —7-5-706,7-5-801 —7-5-809,7-6-101 —7-6-105,7-7-101 —7-7-105,7-7-201 —7-7-203,7-7-301 —7-7-307,7-7-309,7-7-310 [repealed],7-7-401,7-7-402,7-7-403 [repealed],7-8-101 —7-8-104,7-8-301,7-8-302,7-8-304 —7-8-307,25-16-801.

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 946 and 963, codified as §§7-1-101,7-5-107,7-5-211,7-5-301,7-5-302 [repealed],7-5-305,7-5-306,7-5-314,7-5-317,7-7-308,7-7-310,7-7-312,7-7-504 [repealed].

Cross References.

Filing deadline, §7-7-203.

7-1-102. Work time to be scheduled for voting — Penalty.

Each employer in the state shall schedule the work hours of employees on election days so that each employee will have an opportunity to exercise the right of franchise. Any employer who fails or refuses to comply with the provisions of this section shall upon conviction be subject to a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

History.

Acts 1989, No. 545, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Former §7-1-102, concerning suspension of work on election day, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 248, § 16. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1306.